src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@postindus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pos,tindus OLULINE ;
postipakk+N:pos,ti#p´akk TAUD ;
postipaun+N:pos,ti#p´aun%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@postisaadetis+N:@P.NomStem.First@pos,ti#saadetis OLULINE ;
postitasku+N:pos,ti#t´asku%{stemill%} AASTA ;
postitee+N:pos,ti#t´ee%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@postitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@postitus OLULINE ;
postitõld+N:pos,ti#t´õllD1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
postitöötaja+N:pos,ti#t´öötaja AASTA ;
postivanker+N:pos,ti#v´ankE2r REDEL ;
postivedaja+N:pos,ti#vedaja AASTA ;
postkaart+N:p´os,t#k´aart TAUD ;
postkast+N:p´os,t#k´as,t TAUD ;
postkontor+N:p´os,t#k´ontor REDEL ;
postluudium+N:p´ostl´uudium MUUSEUM ;
postmaantee+N:p´os,t#m´aan#t´ee%>%{id%} PUU ;
postmark+N:p´os,t#m´ark TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@postpositsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@p´ostpositsi´oon TAUD ;
postside+N:p´os,t#side PERE ;
postskriptum+N:p´ost#skr´iptum REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@postulaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@p`ostul´aat TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@potas+N:@P.NomStem.First@potas SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@potentaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@p`otent´aat TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@potents+N:@P.NomStem.First@pot´ents TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@potentsiaal+N:@P.NomStem.First@potentsi´aal TAUD ;
potentsiomeeter+N:pot`entsio#m´eetE2r REDEL ;
poti+N:pot,i PERE ;
potikild+N:pot,i#k´illD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
potilaat+N:pot,i#l´aat%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
potipõhi+N:pot,i#p´õhJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
potissepp+N:pot,is#s´epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
pots+N:p´ots%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@potsak+N:@P.NomStem.First@potsak VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@potsatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@potsatus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@potsik+N:@P.NomStem.First@pot,sik VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@pott+N:@P.NomStem.First@p´ot,t TAUD ;
pottsepp+N:p´ot,t#s´epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
pout+N:p´out TAUD ;
povidlo+N:pov`idlo PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@praad+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aaD1 TAUD ;
praadimine+N:pr´aad,imine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@praak+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aak TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@praak+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aak%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@praaker+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aaker REDEL ;
praalija+N:pr´aal,ija AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@praam+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aam TAUD ;
praegusaeg+N:pr´aegus#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
praeguskultuur+N:pr´aegus#kult´uur TAUD ;
pragin+N:pragin MAGUS ;
pragmaatika+N:pragmaatika AASTA ;
pragmatism+N:pragmat´ism TAUD ;
pragu+N:praG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@pragunevus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pragunevus SUULINE ;
prahmakas+N:prahmaka LOHAKAS ;
@P.NomStem.First@praht+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´ahT1 TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@prahvak+N:@P.NomStem.First@prahvak VIRSIK ;
prahvakas+N:prahvaka LOHAKAS ;
@P.NomStem.First@prahvatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@prahvatus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@praks+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aks%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@praksak+N:@P.NomStem.First@praksak VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@praksatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@praksatus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@praksinoskoop+N:@P.NomStem.First@praksino#sk´oop TAUD ;
praksis+N:praksis SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@praktik+N:@P.NomStem.First@praktik VIRSIK ;
praktika+N:praktika AASTA ;
praktikainimene+N:praktika#inimene OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@praktikant+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr`aktik´an,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@praktikum+N:@P.NomStem.First@praktikum TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@praktilisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@praktilisus OLULINE ;
praktitsism+N:praktits´ism TAUD ;
pralinee+N:pralin´ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE ;
@P.NomStem.First@praller+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aller REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@prantsatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@prantsatus OLULINE ;
prantslane+N:pr´antslane SUULINE ;
prantslanna+N:pr´antslanna PERE ;
prantssai+N:pr´ants#s´ai%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@prantsusehaigus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´antsuse#h´aigus OLULINE ;
prantsusehull+N:pr´antsuse#h´ull%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@prantsusehullus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´antsuse#h´ullus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@prantsusehullustus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´antsuse#hullustus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@praost+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´aost TAUD ;
praostihärra+N:praosti#härra PERE ;
praostkond+N:pr´aostk´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.NomStem.First@prass+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´as,s TAUD ;
prassimine+N:pr´as,simine OLULINE ;
pravdalane+N:pravdalane OLULINE ;
preambula+N:pre`ambula AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@predikaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr`edik´aat TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@predikatiiv+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr`edikat´iiv TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@prednisoloon+N:@P.NomStem.First@prednisol´oon TAUD ;
preemia+N:pr´eemia AASTA ;
preeria+N:pr´eeria AASTA ;
preeriahunt+N:pr´eeria#h´un,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@prees+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´ees, TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@preesens+N:@P.NomStem.First@preesens REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@preester+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´eestE2r REDEL ;
preesterkond+N:pr´eesterk´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
preestrinna+N:pr´eestrinna PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@preestritar+N:@P.NomStem.First@preestritar TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@preetor+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´eetor REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@prefekt+N:@P.NomStem.First@pref´ekt TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@prefektuur+N:@P.NomStem.First@prefekt´uur TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@preferanss+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr`efer´anss TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@prefiks+N:@P.NomStem.First@prefiks REDEL ;
preili+N:preili PERE ;
preilna+N:preilna PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@preiskurant+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr`eiskur´an,t TAUD ;
preislane+N:pr´eislane SUULINE ;
preislanna+N:preislanna PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@prelaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@prel´aat TAUD ;
preluudium+N:prel´uudium MUUSEUM ;
@P.NomStem.First@prelüüd+N:@P.NomStem.First@prel´üüd TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@preparaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr`epar´aat TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@preparaator+N:@P.NomStem.First@prepar´aator REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@prepositsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@prepositsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@preprint+N:@P.NomStem.First@prepr´int TAUD ;
prerafaeliit+N:pre#rafael´iit TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@presbüter+N:@P.NomStem.First@presbüter TAUD ;
presbüterlane+N:presbüterlane OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@present+N:@P.NomStem.First@pres´en,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@presentatsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@presentatsi´oon TAUD ;
presentjope+N:pres´en,t#jope PERE ;
presentpüksid+N:pres´en,t#p´üks POISS ;
@P.NomStem.First@preserv+N:@P.NomStem.First@pres´erv TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@preservatiiv+N:@P.NomStem.First@preservat´iiv TAUD ;
presidendikandidaat+N:pr`esiden,di#k`an,did´aat TAUD ;
presidendipalee+N:pr`esiden,di#pal´ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE ;
presidenditool+N:pr`esiden,di#t´ool, TAUD ;
presidendivalimised+N:pr`esiden,di#valimine OLULINE ;
presidendivoor+N:pr`esiden,di#v´oor%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@president+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr`esid´en,t TAUD ;
presiidium+N:pres´iidium MUUSEUM ;
@P.NomStem.First@prespan+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´espan REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@press+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr´es,s TAUD ;
pressibüroo+N:pres,si#bür´oo ARMEE ;
pressiesindaja+N:pres,si#esindaja AASTA ;
pressiklubi+N:pres,si#klubi%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
pressikonverents+N:pres,si#k`onver´ents TAUD ;
pressimine+N:pr´es,simine OLULINE ;
pressinõunik+N:pres,si#n´õun´ik ÄMBLIK ;
pressiosakond+N:pres,si#`osak´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
pressisekretär+N:pres,si#sekretär TAUD ;
pressisõber+N:pres,si#s´õP2E2r%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@pressitalitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pres,si#talitus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@pressiteenistus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pres,si#teenistus OLULINE ;
pressivaenlane+N:pres,si#v´aenlane SUULINE ;
pressraud+N:pr´es,s#r´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@prestiiž+N:@P.NomStem.First@prest´iiž TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@presumptsioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@presumptsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@preteeritum+N:@P.NomStem.First@preteeritum TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@pretendent+N:@P.NomStem.First@pr`etend´en,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@pretensioon+N:@P.NomStem.First@pretensi´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@pretensioonikus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pretensioonikus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@pretoriaan+N:@P.NomStem.First@pretori´aan TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@pretsedenditus+N:@P.NomStem.First@pretsedenditus OLULINE ;
